Washington statutes.
RCW 11.120.030

Applicability.

(1) This chapter applies to:

(a) A fiduciary acting under a will or power of attorney executed before, on, or after June 9, 2016;

(b) A personal representative acting for a decedent who died before, on, or after June 9, 2016;

(c) A guardian acting for an incapacitated person appointed before, on, or after June 9, 2016;

(d) A trustee acting under a trust created before, on, or after June 9, 2016; and

(e) A custodian if the user resides in this state or resided in this state at the time of the user's death.

(2) This chapter does not apply to a digital asset of an employer used by an employee in the ordinary course of the employer's business.

[ 2016 c 140 s 3.]